Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 1. General Licensing Provisions

§ 33-28-101.
Short title; license required.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Real Estate License Act.” It is unlawful for any person to engage in or conduct, directly or indirectly, or to advertise or hold himself out as engaging in real estate activity or acting in the capacity of a licensee within this state without first obtaining a license as provided in this act.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-355.1; Laws 1977, ch. 147, § 1; 1983, ch. 156, § 2; 2011, ch. 104, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “ ‘Real Estate License Act’ “ for “ ‘Real Estate License Act of 1971’,“ deleted “From and after the effective date of this act” before “It is unlawful,” substituted “real estate activity” for “or conducting the business,” substituted “licensee” for “real estate broker, associate broker or a real estate salesman,” and deleted “a broker, associate broker or salesman, as” after “a license as.”

Editor's notes. —

The phrase “effective date of this act,” found near the beginning of the second sentence of this section, first appeared in Laws 1971, ch. 251. Laws 1971, ch. 251, § 20 makes the act effective October 1, 1971.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-28-102(b)(lxii).

Single transaction by unlicensed person is violation barring compensation. —

Under former provisions as to real estate brokers, enacted in exercise of the police power of the state, a person, regularly engaged in another occupation and not licensed under such provisions, who acted as a real estate broker or salesman in but a single isolated real estate transaction, was held to have done so in violation of the provisions and could not receive agreed compensation for such services under an express verbal agreement. Owens v. Capri, 65 Wyo. 325, 202 P.2d 174,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1949).

Where 1 of 2 purchasers of real estate, who was not licensed, sought to recover portion of commission paid on their joint purchase to other purchaser who was duly licensed broker, recovery, which was denied, would have amounted to his receiving a commission contrary to the former provisions as to brokers even though the transaction was an isolated one. Rosenberg v. Rosenblum, 72 Wyo. 91, 261 P.2d 41,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1953).

Contract with unlicensed broker is void. —

Where a person was not a licensed real estate broker in the state of Wyoming, the contract between that person and another to sell a business, the assets of which included leases from an airport board, was void and any actions taken by the unlicensed person to sell the business were unlawful and the unlicensed person was prevented from bringing action for his commission under the laws of Doran v. Imeson Aviation, Inc., 419 F. Supp. 586, 1976 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13489 (D. Wyo. 1976).

Stated

in

Bowlerama, Inc. v. Woodside Realty Co., 752 P.2d 1377,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

Battlefield, Inc. v. Neely, 656 P.2d 1154,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 271

(Wyo. 1983).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Real Estate Brokers and Salespersons — When is a Broker Not a Broker? Walter v. Moore, 700 P.2d 1219,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 485

(Wyo. 1985),” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 241 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of attorney, as such, to act or become licensed to act as real-estate broker, 23 ALR4th 230.

§ 33-28-102.
Definitions.

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 104, § 2.

As used in this act:

“Active license” means a real estate license that has not been inactivated, suspended or revoked;

“Advance fee” means a fee claimed, charged or received for a listing, advertisement or offer to sell or lease real estate issued primarily for promoting the sale or lease of real estate;

“Aggregate limit” means a provision in an insurance contract limiting the maximum liability of an insurer for a series of losses in a given time period, such as the policy term;

“Associate broker” means an individual who has qualified as an associate broker under this act, is licensed by the commission under a responsible broker and does not have supervisory responsibilities;

“Auction,” when used as a noun, means a method of sale at a predetermined date and time, by means of one (1) or more exchanges between an auctioneer and prospective purchasers either in person verbally or physically, or by regular mail, telecommunications, the internet or an electronic transmission, the exchanges consisting of one (1) or more offers to sell made by the auctioneer and offers to purchase made by prospective purchasers, with the right to acceptance of offers to purchase residing with the auctioneer. “Auction” includes a sale of real estate in which there has been a solicitation or invitation by advertisement to the public in advance for bidding using sealed bids, provided that the bids are opened and there is a call for an advancement of the bids. “Auction” when used as a verb, means any act or conduct done for compensation or the expectation thereof and designed, intended or expected to affect the bidding or results of a real estate auction, including, but not limited to, serving as an auctioneer or ringman or encouraging, soliciting or receiving bids;

“Branch office” means any office location of a real estate company that is separate from a principal office and supervised by a responsible broker;

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 166 § 2.

“Buyer” means a person attempting to acquire real estate and includes a tenant as that term is commonly used in the rental, leasing or management of real estate;

“Buyer’s agent” means a licensee who is authorized to represent and act on behalf of the buyer in a real estate transaction;

“Commission” means the Wyoming real estate commission;

“Compensation” means any money, item of value or payment which is provided, promised or expected for the performance of any real estate activity;

“Cooperative transaction” means any real estate transaction in which licensees from more than one (1) real estate company participate, regardless of agency representation;

“Customer” means a party to a real estate transaction who has established no intermediary or agency relationship with any licensee involved in the transaction;

“Degree in real estate” means a degree from an accredited degree granting college or university, including a junior or community college, with a major course of study in real estate. A degree under this section shall at minimum require the successful completion of four (4) core courses of real estate principles and practices, real estate law, real estate appraisal and real estate finance, plus at least two (2) additional real estate related courses. These courses shall total at least eighteen (18) or more semester hours or twenty-seven (27) quarter hours;

“Designated licensee” means a licensee who is designated in writing by a responsible broker to serve as an agent for a seller or a buyer or as an intermediary in a real estate transaction;

“Distance education course” means a course where instruction takes place when the teacher and the student are not in a traditional classroom setting and are separated by distance or time;

“Equivalent coverage” means insurance coverage obtained independently of the group program available through the insurer under contract with the commission and subject to the provisions of this act;

“Errors and omissions insurance” means professional liability insurance which provides insurance coverage to active licensees for errors and omissions made during the course of real estate transactions subject to the coverages, limitations and exclusions of the specific policy;

“Expired license” means a license for which the license period has expired;

“Extended reporting period” means a designated period of time after a claims-made policy has expired during which a claim may be made and coverage obtained as if the claim was made during the policy period;

“Funds holder” means a title company, closing agent or attorney licensed in this state who holds items of value in trust for the parties to a real estate transaction;

“Grace period” means January 1 to March 1 of each year during which an expired license may be renewed;

“Group program” means an insurance policy from an insurance provider selected by the commission through the competitive process as specified in this act;

“Inactive license” means a license that has been placed on inactive status at the request of the licensee and is not expired, terminated, suspended or revoked;

“Individual coverage” means insurance coverage other than coverage from the group program which meets the requirements of the commission;

“In-house real estate transaction” means a real estate transaction in which the buyer and the seller have an agency, intermediary or customer relationship with licensees from the same real estate company;

“Interest in a transaction” means any advantage, benefit or profit, other than the agreed upon compensation, which may be realized by a licensee as the result of a purchase, sale or lease of real estate;

“Intermediary” means a licensee who assists one (1) or more parties throughout a contemplated real estate transaction without acting as an agent or advocate for any party to the transaction;

“License” means the document issued by the commission certifying that the person named by the person’s legal name on the document had fulfilled all requirements for licensure under this act;

“Licensee” means any person issued a license by the commission;

“Like-license” means a license from another jurisdiction which is at an equivalent level of experience and responsibility as a comparable Wyoming license;

“Material to the transaction” means having importance, relevance or consequence to a person making a decision regarding the purchase, sale or lease of real estate. “Material to the transaction” does not include psychological considerations including, but not limited to, health issues, suicide, murder or crimes which have occurred on the property;

“Offer” means any inducement, solicitation or attempt to encourage a person to acquire an interest in real estate which is made for gain or profit;

“Offeree” means a person to whom an offer is made;

“Offeror” means the person making an offer;

“Office” means a responsible broker’s place of business where records are maintained;

“Option” is a right that an owner may give to another person to purchase or lease the owner’s real estate at a specific price;

“Owner” means a person with a right to convey an ownership or leasehold interest in real estate;

“Person” means individuals, corporations, partnerships, associations or other public or private entities, foreign or domestic;

“Prior acts coverage” means insurance coverage for any claim made during a current policy period when the act or acts causing the claim or injuries for which the claim is made occurred prior to the inception of the current policy period;

“Proof of coverage” means a certificate of insurance demonstrating coverage of a policy of insurance equal to or exceeding the group coverage contracted for by the commission;

“Property management” means the act of management for compensation of real estate for another, including collection of rents, maintenance of the real estate and accounting of fees received for another;

“Qualified insurance carrier” means an insurance carrier that:

For the entire term of its contract shall provide the group plan of errors and omission insurance as provided in this act, maintains an A.M. Best rating of “B” or better and financial size category of class VI or higher;

Is authorized by the Wyoming insurance department to do business in Wyoming as an insurance carrier for the policy term;

Is and will remain qualified and authorized by the Wyoming insurance department to write policies of errors and omissions insurance in Wyoming for the policy term;

After competitive bidding, has been notified by the commission that it is the successful bidder for the group plan to provide the errors and omissions insurance as specified in this act;

Has entered into a contract to provide group errors and omissions plan in conformity with the contract, this act, applicable rules of the commission and other applicable law;

Will collect premiums, maintain records and report names of those insured and a record of claims to the commission on a timely basis.

“Real estate” means leaseholds, as well as any other interest or estate in land, whether corporeal, incorporeal, freehold or nonfreehold, and whether the real estate is situated in this state or elsewhere but shall not apply to nor include mineral lands, rights or leases;

“Real estate activity” occurs when an individual for another and for compensation performs any one or more of the following:

Sells, exchanges, purchases, rents, manages or leases real estate;

Offers to sell, exchange, purchase, rent, manage or lease real estate;

Negotiates, offers, attempts or agrees to negotiate the sale, exchange, purchase, rental or leasing of real estate;

Lists, offers, attempts or agrees to list real estate for sale, lease or exchange;

Auctions, offers, attempts or agrees to auction real estate;

Collects, offers, attempts or agrees to collect rent for the use of real estate;

Advertises or holds himself out as being engaged in the business of buying, selling, exchanging, auctioning, renting or leasing real estate;

Engages in the business of charging an advance fee in connection with any contract undertaken to promote the sale, auction or lease of real estate either through its listing in a publication issued for that purpose or for referral of information concerning the real estate to responsible brokers, associate brokers and salespersons;

Buys, sells, offers to buy or sell or otherwise deals in options on real estate or improvements thereon;

Assists or directs in the procuring of prospects calculated to result in the sale, exchange, lease or rental of real estate;

Assists or directs in the negotiation of any transaction calculated or intended to result in the sale, exchange, lease or rental of real estate;

Deals in time shares;

Provides a broker’s price opinion as provided in W.S.

33-28-125

.

“Real estate company” means a domestic or foreign business entity that is authorized to conduct business in Wyoming and licensed by the commission to conduct real estate activity;

“Real estate transaction” or “transaction” means any real estate activity under this section;

“Regular employee” means an individual who is employed by an owner of real estate on a salaried basis or paid wages which are not performance based, is subject to income tax withholding and FICA and whose duties are performed in the ordinary course of the owner’s business or the management or operation of the owner’s investments;

“Responsible broker” means an individual who has an active responsible broker’s license and who is responsible for the supervision of the activities of licensees associated with the real estate company or a responsible broker who operates a single license office or sole proprietorship;

“Retroactive date” means the date when the first real estate errors and omissions coverage was effective insuring the named insured on a claims-made basis and since which time the insured has been continuously insured;

“Salesperson” means an individual who has qualified as a salesperson under this act and is licensed by the commission under a responsible broker;

“Seller” means a person who is attempting to sell or exchange real estate and includes a landlord as that term is commonly used in the rental, leasing or management of real estate;

“Seller’s agent” means a licensee who is authorized to represent and act for the seller in a real estate transaction;

“Short term rental” means the rental of real estate for thirty-one (31) days or less;

“Single-limit liability” means the maximum limit payable, per licensee, for damages arising out of the same error, omission or wrongful act;

“Subagent” means a licensee authorized to represent and act on behalf of a real estate company in performing real estate activity for a principal. A subagent shall owe the same obligations and responsibilities to the principal as a responsible broker;

“Surrendered license” means a license that has been voluntarily terminated or surrendered by a licensee who, at the time of the voluntary termination or surrender, was under investigation or named in a formal administrative complaint and the surrender has been accepted by the commission;

“Suspended license” means a license that has been temporarily suspended by the issuing authority;

“Time share” means any arrangement, whether by membership agreement, lease, rental agreement, license, use agreement or other means, whereby the purchaser receives a right to use or a freehold interest in accommodations, facilities or other real estate for a specific period of time during any given year, but not necessarily for consecutive years, and which extends for a period of more than one (1) year;

“Transaction manager” means a licensee designated in writing by the responsible broker to supervise a transaction. The transaction manager shall not be involved in the transaction and shall have the duties of an intermediary while supervising the transaction;

“Written listing agreement” means any real estate employment agreement, including without limitation a buyer’s brokerage agreement, a seller’s listing contract and a property management contract. The authority created under a written listing agreement may not be assigned to another person without the written consent of all parties to the agreement;

“Broker’s price opinion” means an estimate prepared by a licensee that details the probable selling price of real estate and provides a varying level of detail about the real estate’s condition, market and neighborhood and information about sales of comparable real estate;

“This act” means W.S.

33-28-101

through

33-28-401

.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 251, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 33-355.2; Laws 1973, ch. 152, § 1; 1983, ch. 156, §§ 2, 3; 2008, ch. 2, § 1; 2011, ch. 104, §§ 1, 2; 2012, ch. 68, § 2; 2017 ch. 166, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

As to relationships between brokers and the public, see §

33-28-302

.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “33-28-401” for “33-28-206” in (a)(xviii).

Laws 2008, ch. 2, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2008.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, repealed former (a), which defined terms; and added (b).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, added “performs any one or more of the following” in the introductory language of (b)(xlv); added (b)(xlv)(O) and made related changes; and added (b)(lxii) and redesignated former (b)(lxii) as (b)(lxiii).

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 166, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (b)(iv), substituted “an associate broker” for “a broker,” added “by the commission”; rewrote (b)(vi) which formerly read: “‘Branch office’ means any office of a responsible broker other than his principal place of business; in (b)(xxix), added “by the person’s legal name”; in (b)(xlv)(H) substituted “responsible brokers, associate brokers and salespersons” for “brokers”; rewrote (b)(xlvi) which formerly read: “‘Real estate company’ means a business entity including a firm, company, corporation, partnership, sole proprietorship or other entity which is licensed to conduct real estate activity”; in (b)(xlix) added “responsible” before “broker’s license” and “sole proprietorship” at the end; in (b)(li), added “by the commission,” substituted gender-neutral terms, and made related changes.

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 166, § 2, effective July 1, 2017, deleted (b)(vii), which read: ““Broker” means any person licensed under this act including associate brokers and responsible brokers. “Broker” does not include a salesman.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subparagraph (b)(xlv)(I) or (b)(xlv)(L) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

For meaning of “regular employee” prior to 1983 amendment of this section. —

See Battlefield, Inc. v. Neely, 656 P.2d 1154,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 271

(Wyo. 1983).

Real estate agent, not acting as agent, not held to standard of agent. —

The daughter-in-law of the seller of certain property, who was a licensed real estate agent, and who was “helping out” her mother-in-law in the sales transaction, but who never met the buyers in person, who did not obtain loan information, show houses to them, convey offers to purchase, negotiate the sales price or terms of sale, develop a close relationship with the buyers, list the property or show it or sell it, and who was not paid a commission, was not acting as a real estate agent and was not held to the standard of a real estate agent. Walter v. Moore, 700 P.2d 1219,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 485

(Wyo. 1985).

Commission not earned by broker. —

Where broker had not been employed to sell defendant's property, he could not, by securing a purchaser, notifying defendants of that fact, and requesting protection on his commission, render defendants liable to him for commission on sale made direct to such customer. Stevens v. Brimmer, 35 Wyo. 452, 251 P. 1,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1926).

Contract with unlicensed broker is void. —

Where a person was not a licensed real estate broker in the state of Wyoming, the contract between that person and another to sell a business, the assets of which included leases from an airport board, was void and any actions taken by the unlicensed person to sell the business were unlawful and the unlicensed person was prevented from bringing action for his commission under the laws of Wyoming. Doran v. Imeson Aviation, Inc., 419 F. Supp. 586, 1976 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13489 (D. Wyo. 1976).

Quoted

in

Bowlerama, Inc. v. Woodside Realty Co., 752 P.2d 1377,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1988).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Real Estate Brokers and Salespersons — When is a Broker Not a Broker? Walter v. Moore, 700 P.2d 1219,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 485

(Wyo. 1985),” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 241 (1986).

§ 33-28-103.
Exemptions.

The provisions of this act shall not apply to:

An owner of real estate or to a member of his immediate family or to his regular employees with respect to property owned by him unless the owner, his immediate family or regular employee is a licensee;

An attorney in fact under a duly executed and recorded power of attorney to convey real estate from the owner or lessor, or the services rendered by an attorney-at-law in the performance of his duties as an attorney unless the attorney is a licensee;

Any individual acting as receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, administrator, executor, or guardian, or while acting under a court order or under the authority of a will or of a trust instrument or as a witness in any judicial proceeding or other proceeding conducted by the state or any governmental subdivision or agency unless that individual is a licensee;

Any officer or employee of a federal agency in the conduct of his official duties, unless that individual is a licensee;

Any officer or employee of the state government or any political subdivision thereof performing his official duties, unless that individual is a licensee;

Any person or employee acting as the resident manager for the owner or an employee acting as the resident manager for a responsible broker managing an apartment building, duplex, apartment complex or court, when the resident manager resides on the premises and is engaged in the leasing of real estate in connection with his employment, unless that individual is a licensee; or

A home owner’s association formed and acting pursuant to its declaration and bylaws or a resort association formed and acting pursuant to its association agreement and bylaws.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 251, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 33-355.3; Laws 1973, ch. 152, § 1; 1983, ch. 156, § 2; 2009, ch. 63, § 1; 2011, ch. 104, § 1; 2017 ch. 166, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added “unless the owner, his immediate family or regular employee is a licensee” following “owned by him” in (a)(i), and added “unless the attorney is a licensee” following “attorney” in (a)(ii).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a)(iii) through (a)(vi), added “unless that individual is a licensee,” and substituted “real estate” for “property” in (a)(vi).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(vi) substituted “responsible broker” for “broker.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-28-102(b)(lxii).

Meaning of “regular employee” prior to 1983 amendment of §

33-28-102

. —

See Battlefield, Inc. v. Neely, 656 P.2d 1154,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 271

(Wyo. 1983).

Cited

in

McCoy v. Thompson, 677 P.2d 839,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 265

(Wyo. 1984).

Library references. —

17 Nat. Resources & Env't Law Review 95.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of attorney, as such, to act or become licensed to act as real-estate broker, 23 ALR4th 230.

§ 33-28-104.
Acts constituting person as licensee.

Any person who, for another, with the intention or upon the promise of receiving compensation offers, attempts or agrees to perform, or performs any single act of real estate activity, whether as a part of a transaction or as the entire transaction shall be deemed to be acting as a licensee within the meaning of this act.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 251, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 33-355.4; Laws 1983, ch. 156, § 2; 2011, ch. 104, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “compensation” for “any valuable consideration,” substituted “of real estate activity” for “defined in W.S. 33-28-102(a)(iii),” and substituted “licensee” for “broker, associate broker or salesman.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-28-102(b)(lxii).

Real estate agent, not acting as agent, not held to standard of agent. —

The daughter-in-law of the seller of certain property, who was a licensed real estate agent, and who was “helping out” her mother-in-law in the sales transaction, but who never met the buyers in person, who did not obtain loan information, show houses to them, convey offers to purchase, negotiate the sales price or terms of sale, develop a close relationship with the buyers, list the property or show it or sell it, and who was not paid a commission, was not acting as a real estate agent and was not held to the standard of a real estate agent. Walter v. Moore, 700 P.2d 1219,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 485

(Wyo. 1985).

Stated

in

Bowlerama, Inc. v. Woodside Realty Co., 752 P.2d 1377,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

McCoy v. Thompson, 677 P.2d 839,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 265

(Wyo. 1984).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Real Estate Brokers and Salespersons — When is a Broker Not a Broker? Walter v. Moore, 700 P.2d 1219,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 485

(Wyo. 1985),” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 241 (1986).

§ 33-28-105.
Creation of commission; membership; terms; removal; chairman; powers and duties; director and duties thereof; other employees; compensation; disposition of fees.

The Wyoming real estate commission is created to consist of five (5) commissioners, each of whom shall be a citizen of Wyoming, appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. Not less than three (3) or more than four (4) of the membership shall have been engaged in business as a licensee in Wyoming for at least five (5) years immediately preceding appointment. No more than one (1) commissioner shall be appointed from the same county to serve at the same time. The term of the members of the commission shall be for three (3) years and until their successors are appointed and qualified. Members appointed to fill vacancies shall be appointed in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

, and no member shall be appointed to succeed himself for more than one (1) full term. The governor may remove any commission member as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. The commission at its first meeting held after September 1 of each year shall select a chairman to serve for the following year. The commission has the power to regulate the issuance of licenses, to revoke or suspend licenses issued under this act, to censure licensees and may do all things necessary and proper to carry out the provisions of this act. The commission may, from time to time, promulgate and amend necessary and reasonable rules and regulations for these purposes. Appointments and terms shall be in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

.

Repealed by Laws 1983, ch. 156, § 3.

The commission shall employ a director. The director is subject to the rules and regulations of the human resources division of the department of administration and information. The director’s salary shall be paid from the real estate commission account specified in subsection (g) of this section. The duties of the director shall include the following:

Maintain and operate a suitable office for the commission;

Keep books, records and accounts of all activities of the commission;

Issue real estate responsible broker, associate broker, salesperson and real estate company licenses;

Make investigations of complaints and possible violations of the real estate laws and practices of licensees and to furnish information and recommendations to the commission for their action;

Assist the commission with examinations to be given applicants for real estate licenses, and to conduct the examinations at the direction of the commission;

Assist the commission in holding educational clinics or meetings when deemed advisable with the aim of promoting higher standards of practice in the real estate profession;

Assist the commission in promulgating rules in compliance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

], for the operation of the commission and the implementation of this law; and

Perform other duties as the commission prescribes.

The commission shall employ other staff members to assist in the discharge of the duties imposed upon it by this act and shall prescribe the duties and fix the compensation of its staff members, subject to the rules and regulations of the human resources division of the department of administration and information. The office of the commission shall be maintained in Cheyenne and all files, records and property of the commission shall at all times remain in the Cheyenne office. No commission staff member may be a paid employee of any real estate association, real estate company or real estate licensee.

Each member of the commission shall receive compensation from the real estate commission account for each day actually spent on his official duties including per diem and mileage as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii) and salary in the amount provided by W.S. 28-5-101(d) for the performance of official duties.

The commission shall adopt a seal, including the words Wyoming Real Estate Commission, Office of the Commission by which the acts of the commission shall be authenticated. Copies of all records and papers in the office of the commission, certified by the signature of the director and the seal of the commission, shall be received in evidence in all cases equally and with like effect as the originals.

All fees collected by the commission shall be deposited in the state treasury. The state treasurer shall deposit the fees to the credit of the real estate commission account. Disbursements from the account shall not exceed the monies credited to it.

The presence of three (3) members of the commission shall constitute a quorum. In the absence of the chairman, the member of the commission present who is senior in time of service shall serve as the presiding officer. The action of the majority of the members of the commission shall be deemed the action of the commission.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 251, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 33-355.5; Laws 1973, ch. 179, § 1; ch. 245, § 3; 1977, ch. 147, § 1; 1979, ch. 17, § 2; 1983, ch. 156, §§ 2, 3; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; 1997, ch. 178, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2009, ch. 63, § 1; 2011, ch. 104, § 1; 2014 ch. 69, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2017 ch. 166, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” following “real estate board account” in (c), (e), and (g).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (e), deleted “, twenty dollars ($20.00) and” preceding “per diem” and inserted “and salary in the amount provided by W.S. 28-5-101(d)” following “state employees”.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), substituted “a licensee” for “an active salesperson or broker,” added “to serve at the same time,” and deleted “Effective July 1, 1979” at the beginning of the last sentence; in the introductory language of (c) and in (e) and (g), substituted “commission” for “board”; in (c)(v), deleted “broker and salesman” after “real estate”; in (e), added “including,” and made stylistic changes; in (f), deleted the former last three sentences, which read: “The presence of three (3) members of the commission shall constitute a quorum. In the absence of the chairman, the member of the commission present who is senior in time of service shall serve as presiding officer. The action of the majority of the members of the commission shall be deemed the action of the commission”; and added (h).

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (e), substituted “as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii)” for “allowance as allowed for state employees.”

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, rewrote (c)(iii), which formerly read: “Issue real estate broker licenses”; in (d) substituted “staff member” for “employees” or variants, and substituted “real estate company or real estate licensee” for “or group of real estate dealers or brokers”; and made related changes.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-28-102(b)(lxii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Applied

in

Battlefield, Inc. v. Neely, 656 P.2d 1154,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 271

(Wyo. 1983).

Law reviews. —

For article, “A State Central Panel Hearing Officer System for Wyoming,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 497 (1986).